Alabama, session 2026rs, SB163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
8 Section 1. Article 3, commencing with Section 34-7B-80,
9 is added to Chapter 7B of Title 34 of the Code of Alabama
10 1975, to read as follows:
11 Article 3. Esthetics Licensure Compact.
12 §34-7B-80 Purpose.
13 (a) The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the
14 interstate practice and regulation of esthetics with the goal
15 of improving public access to, and the safety of, esthetics
16 services and reducing barriers related to esthetician
17 licensure. Through this compact, the member states seek to
18 establish a regulatory framework that provides for a new
19 multistate licensing program. Through this new licensing
20 program, the member states seek to provide increased value and
21 mobility to licensed estheticians in the member states, while
22 ensuring the provision of safe, effective, and reliable
23 services to the public.
24 (b) This compact is designed to achieve the following
25 objectives, and the member states hereby ratify the same
26 intentions by subscribing hereto:
27 (1) Provide opportunities for interstate practice by
28 estheticians who meet uniform requirements for multistate
Page 1

estheticians who meet uniform requirements for multistate
SB163 Enrolled
29 licensure;
30 (2) Enhance the abilities of member states to protect
31 public health and safety, and prevent fraud and unlicensed
32 activity within the profession;
33 (3) Ensure and encourage cooperation between member
34 states in the licensure and regulation of the practice of
35 esthetics;
36 (4) Support relocating military members and their
37 spouses;
38 (5) Facilitate the exchange of information between
39 member states related to the licensure, investigation, and
40 discipline of the practice of esthetics; and
41 (6) Provide for the licensure and mobility of the
42 workforce in the profession.
43 §34-7B-81 Definitions.
44 As used in this compact, and except as otherwise
45 provided, the following definitions govern the terms herein:
46 (1) ACTIVE DUTY. Any individual in full-time duty
47 status in the active uniformed service of the United States,
48 including members of the National Guard and Reserve.
49 (2) ADVERSE ACTION. Any administrative, civil,
50 equitable, or criminal action permitted by a member state's
51 laws which is imposed by a licensing authority or other
52 regulatory body against an esthetician, including actions
53 against an individual's license or authorization to practice
54 such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
55 licensee, limitation of the licensee's practice, or any other
56 encumbrance on a license affecting an individual's ability to
Page 2

encumbrance on a license affecting an individual's ability to
SB163 Enrolled
57 participate in the esthetics industry, including the issuance
58 of a cease and desist order.
59 (3) AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE. A legal authorization
60 associated with a multistate license permitting the practice
61 of esthetics in that remote state, which shall be subject to
62 the enforcement jurisdiction of the licensing authority in
63 that remote state.
64 (4) ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM. A non-disciplinary monitoring
65 or prosecutorial diversion program approved by a member
66 state's licensing authority.
67 (5) BACKGROUND CHECK. The submission of information for
68 an applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant's
69 criminal history record information, as further defined in 28
70 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and
71 the agency responsible for retaining state criminal or
72 disciplinary history in the applicant's home state.
73 (6) CHARTER MEMBER STATE. Member states who have
74 enacted legislation to adopt this compact where such
75 legislation predates the effective date of this compact as
76 defined in Section 34-7B-92.
77 (7) COMMISSION. The joint government agency whose
78 membership consists of all states that have enacted this
79 compact, which is known as the Esthetics Licensure Compact
80 Commission, as defined in Section 34-7B-88, and which shall
81 operate as an instrumentality of the member states.
82 (8) CURRENT SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION.
83 Either of the following:
84 a. Investigative information that a licensing
Page 3

a. Investigative information that a licensing
SB163 Enrolled
85 authority, after an inquiry or investigation that complies
86 with a member state's due process requirements, has reason to
87 believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate
88 a violation of that state's laws regarding fraud or the
89 practice of esthetics.
90 b. Investigative information that indicates that a
91 licensee has engaged in fraud or represents an immediate
92 threat to public health and safety, regardless of whether the
93 licensee has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
94 (9) DATA SYSTEM. A repository of information about
95 licensees including, but not limited to, license status,
96 investigative information, and adverse actions.
97 (10) DISQUALIFYING EVENT. Any event that shall
98 disqualify an individual from holding a multistate license
99 under this compact and which the commission, by rule or order,
100 may specify.
101 (11) ENCUMBERED LICENSE. A license in which an adverse
102 action restricts the practice of esthetics by a licensee, or
103 where the adverse action has been reported to the commission.
104 (12) ENCUMBRANCE. A revocation or suspension of, or any
105 limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of esthetics
106 by a licensing authority.
107 (13) ESTHETICIAN. An individual licensed in his or her
108 home state to engage in the practice of esthetics as defined
109 in this section.
110 (14) ESTHETICS. The skin care and services for cosmetic
111 purposes provided by an esthetician in a member state as set
112 forth in the relevant statutes and rules of a member state.
Page 4

forth in the relevant statutes and rules of a member state.
SB163 Enrolled
113 The practice of esthetics occurs in the member state where the
114 client is located at the time of service.
115 (15) EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE. A group of delegates elected
116 or appointed to act on behalf of and within the powers granted
117 to them by the commission.
118 (16) HOME STATE. The member state that is a licensee's
119 primary state of residence and where that licensee holds an
120 active and unencumbered license to practice esthetics.
121 (17) INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION. Information, records,
122 or documents received or generated by a licensing authority
123 pursuant to an investigation or other inquiry.
124 (18) JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENT. The assessment of an
125 individual's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the
126 practice of esthetics in a state.
127 (19) LICENSEE. An individual who currently holds a
128 license from a member state to practice as an esthetician.
129 (20) LICENSING AUTHORITY. A state's administrative or
130 regulatory body responsible for regulating the practice of
131 esthetics, or which is responsible for issuing licenses to
132 estheticians or otherwise overseeing the practice of esthetics
133 in that state.
134 (21) MEMBER STATE. Any state that has adopted this
135 compact.
136 (22) MULTISTATE LICENSE. A license issued and subject
137 to the enforcement jurisdiction of the licensing authority in
138 a licensee's home state, which authorizes the practice of
139 esthetics in member states and includes authorizations to
140 practice esthetics in all remote states pursuant to this
Page 5

practice esthetics in all remote states pursuant to this
SB163 Enrolled
141 compact.
142 (23) REMOTE STATE. Any member state, other than the
143 licensee's home state.
144 (24) RULE. A regulation adopted by the commission under
145 this compact, or an authorized entity, that has the force of
146 law.
147 (25) SINGLE-STATE LICENSE. A license issued by a member
148 state that authorizes the practice of esthetics only within
149 the issuing state and does not include any authorization
150 outside of the issuing state.
151 (26) STATE. A state, commonwealth, territory, or
152 possession of the United States and the District of Columbia.
153 §34-7B-82 Member state requirements.
154 (a) To be eligible to join this compact, and to
155 maintain eligibility as a member state, a state must do all of
156 the following:
157 (1) License estheticians and regulate esthetics.
158 (2) Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and
159 investigate complaints about licensees practicing in that
160 state.
161 (3) Require that licensees within the state pass a
162 competency examination prior to being licensed to provide
163 esthetics services to the public in that state.
164 (4) Require that licensees satisfy educational or
165 training requirements prior to being licensed to provide
166 esthetics services to the public in that state.
167 (5) Implement procedures for considering one or more of
168 the following categories of information from applicants for
Page 6

the following categories of information from applicants for
SB163 Enrolled
169 licensure: (i) criminal history; (ii) disciplinary history; or
170 (iii) background check. Such procedures may include the
171 submission of information by applicants for the purpose of
172 obtaining an applicant's background check as defined herein.
173 (6) Participate in the data system, including through
174 the use of unique identifying numbers.
175 (7) Share information related to adverse actions with
176 the commission and other member states, both through the data
177 system and otherwise.
178 (8) Notify the commission and other member states, in
179 compliance with the terms of the compact and rules of the
180 commission, of the existence of investigative information or
181 current significant investigative information in the state's
182 possession regarding a licensee practicing in that state.
183 (9) Comply with such rules as may be enacted by the
184 commission to administer the compact.
185 (10) Accept licensees from other member states as
186 established herein.
187 (b) Member states may charge a fee for granting a
188 multistate license to practice esthetics.
189 (c) Individuals not residing in a member state shall
190 continue to be able to apply for a member state's single-state
191 license as provided under the laws of each member state.
192 However, the single-state license granted to these individuals
193 shall not be recognized as granting a multistate license to
194 provide services in any other member state.
195 (d) Nothing in this compact shall affect the
196 requirements established by a member state for the issuance of
Page 7

requirements established by a member state for the issuance of
SB163 Enrolled
197 a single-state license.
198 (e) A multistate license issued to a licensee by a home
199 state to a resident of that state shall be recognized by each
200 member state as authorizing a licensee to practice esthetics
201 in each member state.
202 (f) At no point shall the commission have the power to
203 define the educational or professional requirements for a
204 license to practice esthetics. The member states shall retain
205 sole jurisdiction over the provision of these requirements.
206 §34-7B-83 Multistate license.
207 (a) To be eligible to apply to his or her home state's
208 licensing authority for an initial multistate license under
209 this compact, a licensee must hold an active and unencumbered
210 single-state license to practice esthetics in his or her home
211 state.
212 (b) Upon the receipt of an application for a multistate
213 license, according to the rules of the commission, a member
214 state's licensing authority shall ascertain whether the
215 applicant meets the requirements for a multistate license
216 under this compact.
217 (c) If an applicant meets the requirements for a
218 multistate license under this compact and any applicable rules
219 of the commission, the licensing authority in receipt of the
220 application, within a reasonable time, shall grant a
221 multistate license to that applicant and inform all member
222 states of the grant of the multistate license.
223 (d) A multistate license to practice esthetics issued
224 by a member state's licensing authority shall be recognized by
Page 8

by a member state's licensing authority shall be recognized by
SB163 Enrolled
225 each member state as authorizing the practice thereof as
226 though that licensee held a single-state license to do so in
227 each member state, subject to the restrictions herein.
228 (e) A multistate license granted pursuant to this
229 compact may be effective for a definite period of time,
230 concurrent with the licensure renewal period in the home
231 state.
232 (f) To maintain a multistate license under this
233 compact, a licensee must:
234 (1) Agree to abide by the rules of the licensing
235 authority, and the state scope of practice laws governing the
236 practice of esthetics, of any member state in which the
237 licensee provides services;
238 (2) Pay all required fees related to the application
239 and process, and any other fees which the commission, by rule,
240 may require; and
241 (3) Comply with any and all other requirements
242 regarding multistate licenses which the commission, by rule,
243 may provide.
244 (g) A licensee practicing in a member state is subject
245 to all scope of practice laws governing esthetics services in
246 that state.
247 (h) The practice of esthetics under a multistate
248 license granted pursuant to this compact will subject the
249 licensee to the jurisdiction of the licensing authority, the
250 courts, and the laws of the member state in which the
251 esthetics services are provided.
252 §34-7B-84 Reissuance of a multistate license by a new
Page 9

§34-7B-84 Reissuance of a multistate license by a new
SB163 Enrolled
253 home state.
254 (a) A licensee may hold a multistate license, issued by
255 his or her home state, in only one member state at any given
256 time.
257 (b) If a licensee changes his or her home state by
258 moving between two member states:
259 (1) The licensee shall immediately apply for the
260 reissuance of his or her multistate license in his or her new
261 home state. The licensee shall pay all applicable fees and
262 notify the prior home state in accordance with the rules of
263 the commission;
264 (2) Upon receipt of an application to reissue a
265 multistate license, the new home state shall verify that the
266 multistate license is active, unencumbered, and eligible for
267 reissuance under the terms of the compact and the rules of the
268 commission. The multistate license issued by the prior home
269 state will be deactivated and all member states notified in
270 accordance with the applicable rules adopted by the
271 commission;
272 (3) If required for initial licensure, the new home
273 state may require a background check as specified in the laws
274 of the new home state or compliance with any jurisprudence
275 requirements of the new home state; and
276 (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
277 compact, if a licensee does not meet the requirements set
278 forth in this compact for the reissuance of a multistate
279 license by the new home state, then the licensee shall be
280 subject to the new home state requirements for the issuance of
Page 10

subject to the new home state requirements for the issuance of
SB163 Enrolled
281 a single-state license in that state.
282 (c) If a licensee changes his or her primary state of
283 residence by moving from a member state to a nonmember state,
284 or from a nonmember state to a member state, then the licensee
285 shall be subject to the state requirements for the issuance of
286 a single-state license in the new home state.
287 (d) Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a
288 licensee's ability to hold a single-state license in multiple
289 states; however, for the purposes of this compact, a licensee
290 shall have only one home state and only one multistate
291 license.
292 (e) Nothing in this compact shall interfere with the
293 requirements established by a member state for the issuance of
294 a single-state license.
295 §34-7B-85 Authority of the compact commission and
296 member state licensing authorities.
297 (a) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the
298 commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any
299 way reduce the ability of a member state to enact and enforce
300 laws or other rules related to the practice of esthetics in
301 that state, where those laws or other rules are not
302 inconsistent with the provisions of this compact.
303 (b) Insofar as practical, a member state's licensing
304 authority shall cooperate with the commission and with each
305 entity exercising independent regulatory authority over the
306 practice of esthetics according to the provisions of this
307 compact.
308 (c) Discipline shall be the sole responsibility of the
Page 11

(c) Discipline shall be the sole responsibility of the
SB163 Enrolled
309 state in which esthetics services are provided. Accordingly,
310 each member state's licensing authority shall be responsible
311 for receiving complaints about individuals practicing
312 esthetics in that state and for communicating all relevant
313 investigative information about any such adverse action to the
314 other member states through the data system in addition to any
315 other methods the commission, by rule, may require.
316 §34-7B-86 Adverse actions.
317 (a) A licensee's home state shall have exclusive power
318 to impose an adverse action against a licensee's multistate
319 license issued by the home state.
320 (b) A home state may take adverse action on a
321 multistate license based on the investigative information,
322 current significant investigative information, or adverse
323 action of a remote state.
324 (c) In addition to the powers conferred by state law,
325 each remote state's licensing authority shall have the power
326 to:
327 (1) Take adverse action against a licensee's
328 authorization to practice esthetics through the multistate
329 license in that member state, provided that:
330 a. Only the licensee's home state shall have the power
331 to take adverse action against the multistate license issued
332 by the home state; and
333 b. For the purpose of taking an adverse action, the
334 home state's licensing authority shall give the same priority
335 and effect to reported conduct received from a remote state as
336 it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state.
Page 12

it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state.
SB163 Enrolled
337 In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to
338 determine the appropriate action.
339 (2) Issue cease and desist orders or impose an
340 encumbrance on a licensee's authorization to practice within
341 that member state;
342 (3) Complete any pending investigations of a licensee
343 who changes his or her primary state of residence during the
344 course of such an investigation. The licensing authority shall
345 also be empowered to report the results of such an
346 investigation to the commission through the data system as
347 described herein;
348 (4) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and
349 investigations that require the attendance and testimony of
350 witnesses, as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas
351 issued by a licensing authority in a member state for the
352 attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of
353 evidence from another member state shall be enforced in the
354 latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according
355 to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to
356 subpoenas issued in proceedings before it. The issuing
357 licensing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
358 expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service
359 statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are
360 located;
361 (5) If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from
362 the affected licensee the costs of investigations and
363 disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken
364 against that licensee; and
Page 13

against that licensee; and
SB163 Enrolled
365 (6) Take adverse action against the licensee's
366 authorization to practice in that state based on the factual
367 findings of another remote state.
368 (d) A licensee's home state shall complete any pending
369 investigation of an esthetician who changes his or her primary
370 state of residence while the investigation is pending. The
371 home state shall also have the authority to take appropriate
372 action and shall promptly report the conclusions of any
373 investigation to the data system.
374 (e) If an adverse action is taken by the home state
375 against a licensee's multistate license, the licensee's
376 authorization to practice in all other member states shall be
377 deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the
378 home state license. All home state disciplinary orders that
379 impose an adverse action against a licensee's multistate
380 license shall include a statement that the esthetician's
381 authorization to practice is deactivated in all member states
382 during the pendency of the order.
383 (f) Nothing in this compact shall override a member
384 state's authority to accept a licensee's participation in an
385 alternative program in lieu of adverse action. A licensee's
386 multistate license shall be suspended for the duration of the
387 licensee's participation in any alternative program.
388 (g) Joint investigations.
389 (1) In addition to the authority granted to a member
390 state by its respective scope of practice laws or other
391 applicable state law, a member state may participate with
392 other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
Page 14

other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
SB163 Enrolled
393 (2) Member states shall share any investigative,
394 litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any
395 joint or individual investigation initiated under the compact.
396 §34-7B-87 Active duty military and their spouses.
397 An active duty military service member or his or her
398 spouse shall designate a home state where the individual has a
399 current license in good standing. The individual or spouse may
400 retain his or her home state designation during any period of
401 service when that individual is on active duty.
402 §34-7B-88 Establishment and operation of the Esthetics
403 Licensure Compact Commission.
404 (a) The compact member states hereby create and
405 establish a joint government agency whose membership consists
406 of all member states that have enacted the compact known as
407 the Esthetics Licensure Compact Commission. The commission is
408 an instrumentality of the compact states acting jointly and
409 not an instrumentality of any one state. The commission shall
410 come into existence on or after the effective date of the
411 compact as set forth in Section 34-7B-92.
412 (b) Membership, voting, and meetings.
413 (1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one
414 delegate selected by that member state's licensing authority.
415 (2) The delegate shall be an administrator of the
416 licensing authority of the member state or their designee.
417 (3) The commission, by rule or bylaw, shall establish a
418 term of office for delegates and, by rule or bylaw, may
419 establish term limits.
420 (4) The commission may recommend removal or suspension
Page 15

(4) The commission may recommend removal or suspension
SB163 Enrolled
421 of any delegate from office.
422 (5) A member state's licensing authority shall fill any
423 vacancy of its delegate occurring on the commission within 60
424 days of the vacancy.
425 (6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all
426 matters that are voted on by the commission.
427 (7) The commission shall meet at least once during each
428 calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in
429 the bylaws. The commission may meet by telecommunication,
430 video conference, or other similar electronic means.
431 (c) The commission shall have the following powers:
432 (1) Establish the fiscal year of the commission.
433 (2) Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest
434 policies.
435 (3) Adopt rules and bylaws.
436 (4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with
437 the bylaws.
438 (5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with
439 the provisions of this compact, the commission's rules, and
440 the bylaws.
441 (6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions
442 in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of
443 any licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law
444 shall not be affected.
445 (7) Maintain and certify records and information
446 provided to a member state as the authenticated business
447 records of the commission and designate an agent to do so on
448 the commission's behalf.
Page 16

the commission's behalf.
SB163 Enrolled
449 (8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.
450 (9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of
451 personnel including, but not limited to, employees of a member
452 state.
453 (10) Conduct an annual financial review.
454 (11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
455 compensation, define duties, grant such individuals
456 appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
457 compact, and establish the commission's personnel policies and
458 programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of
459 personnel, and other related personnel matters.
460 (12) As set forth in the commission rules, charge a fee
461 to a licensee for the grant of a multistate license and
462 thereafter, as may be established by commission rule, charge
463 the licensee a multistate license renewal fee for each renewal
464 period. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a home
465 state from charging a licensee a fee for a multistate license
466 or renewals of a multistate license or a fee for the
467 jurisprudence requirement if the member state imposes such a
468 requirement for the grant of multistate license.
469 (13) Assess and collect fees.
470 (14) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations,
471 grants of money, other sources of revenue, equipment,
472 supplies, materials, and services and receive, utilize, and
473 dispose of the same, provided that at all times the commission
474 shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of
475 interest.
476 (15) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or
Page 17

(15) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or
SB163 Enrolled
477 use any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided
478 interest therein.
479 (16) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
480 abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal,
481 or mixed.
482 (17) Establish a budget and make expenditures.
483 (18) Borrow money.
484 (19) Appoint committees, including standing committees,
485 composed of members, state regulators, state legislators or
486 their representatives, and consumer representatives and such
487 other interested persons as may be designated in this compact
488 and the bylaws.
489 (20) Provide and receive information from, and
490 cooperate with, law enforcement agencies.
491 (21) Elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, and
492 treasurer and such other officers of the commission as
493 provided in the commission's bylaws.
494 (22) Establish and elect an executive committee,
495 including a chair and a vice chair.
496 (23) Adopt and provide to the participating states an
497 annual report.
498 (24) Determine whether a state's adopted language is
499 materially different from the model compact language such that
500 the state would not qualify for participation in the compact.
501 (25) Perform such other functions as may be necessary
502 or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact.
503 (d) The executive committee.
504 (1) The executive committee shall have the power to act
Page 18

(1) The executive committee shall have the power to act
SB163 Enrolled
505 on behalf of the commission according to the terms of this
506 compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the
507 executive committee shall include:
508 a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the
509 administration of the compact, including compliance with the
510 provisions of the compact, the commission's rules and bylaws,
511 and other such duties as deemed necessary.
512 b. Recommending to the commission changes to the rules
513 or bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees charged
514 to compact member states, fees charged to licensees, and other
515 fees.
516 c. Ensuring compact administration services are
517 appropriately provided, including by contract.
518 d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
519 e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the
520 commission;
521 f. Monitoring compact compliance of member states and
522 providing compliance reports to the commission;
523 g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
524 h. Exercise the powers and duties of the commission
525 during the interim between commission meetings, except for
526 adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and
527 exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to
528 the commission by rule or bylaw; and
529 i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of
530 the commission.
531 (2) The executive committee shall be composed of up to
532 seven voting members:
Page 19

seven voting members:
SB163 Enrolled
533 a. The chair and vice chair of the commission and any
534 other members of the commission who serve on the executive
535 committee shall be voting members of the executive committee;
536 b. Other than the chair and vice chair, secretary, and
537 treasurer, the commission shall elect three voting members
538 from the current membership of the commission; and
539 c. The commission may elect ex officio, nonvoting
540 members from a recognized national organization as approved by
541 the commission. The commission's bylaws shall identify
542 qualifying organizations and the manner of appointment if the
543 number of organizations seeking to appoint an ex officio
544 member exceeds the number of members specified in this
545 section.
546 (3) The commission may remove any member of the
547 executive committee as provided in the commission's bylaws.
548 (4) The executive committee shall meet at least
549 annually.
550 a. Annual executive committee meetings, as well as any
551 executive committee meeting during which the executive
552 committee does not take or intend to take formal action on a
553 matter for which a commission vote would otherwise be
554 required, shall be open to the public, except that the
555 executive committee may meet in a closed, nonpublic session of
556 a public meeting when dealing with any of the matters covered
557 under subdivision (f)(4).
558 b. The executive committee shall give five business
559 days advance notice of its public meetings, posted on its
560 website, and any other means as provided in the commission's
Page 20

website, and any other means as provided in the commission's
SB163 Enrolled
561 rules, to provide notice to persons with an interest in the
562 public matters the executive committee intends to address at
563 those meetings.
564 (5) The executive committee may hold an emergency
565 meeting when acting for the commission to:
566 a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
567 welfare;
568 b. Prevent a loss of commission or participating state
569 funds; or
570 c. Protect public health and safety.
571 (e) The commission shall adopt and provide to the
572 member states an annual report.
573 (f) Meetings of the commission.
574 (1) All meetings of the commission that are not closed
575 pursuant to this subsection shall be open to the public.
576 Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the commission's
577 website at least 30 days prior to the public meeting.
578 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), the commission may
579 convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least
580 24-hours prior notice on the commission's website, and any
581 other means as provided in the commission's rules, for any of
582 the reasons the commission may dispense with notice of
583 proposed rulemaking under Section 34-7B-90(l). The
584 commission's legal counsel shall certify one of the reasons
585 justifying an emergency public meeting has been met.
586 (3) Notice of all commission meetings shall provide the
587 time, date, and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is
588 to be held or accessible via telecommunication, video
Page 21

to be held or accessible via telecommunication, video
SB163 Enrolled
589 conference, or other electronic means, the notice shall
590 include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
591 (4) The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic
592 meeting for the commission to discuss the following:
593 a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations
594 under the compact.
595 b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other
596 matters, practices, or procedures related to specific
597 employees, or other matters related to the commission's
598 internal personnel practices and procedures.
599 c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by
600 the commission or by a member state's licensing authority.
601 d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
602 litigation.
603 e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
604 sale of goods, services, or real estate.
605 f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
606 any person.
607 g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
608 that is privileged or confidential.
609 h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure
610 would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
611 privacy.
612 i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
613 purposes.
614 j. Information related to any investigative reports
615 prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or
616 other committee charged with responsibility of investigation
Page 22

other committee charged with responsibility of investigation
SB163 Enrolled
617 or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact.
618 k. Legal advice.
619 l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the
620 public by federal or member state law.
621 m. Other matters as adopted by the commission, by rule.
622 (5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed,
623 the presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be
624 closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and
625 such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
626 (6) The commission shall keep minutes that fully and
627 clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
628 provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken and the
629 reasons therefore, including a description of the views
630 expressed. All documents considered in connection with an
631 action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and
632 documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject
633 to release only by a majority vote of the commission or order
634 of a court of competent jurisdiction.
635 (g) Financing of the commission.
636 (1) The commission shall pay, or provide for the
637 payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment,
638 organization, and ongoing activities.
639 (2) The commission may accept any and all appropriate
640 sources of revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
641 supplies, materials, and services.
642 (3) The commission may levy on, and collect an annual
643 assessment from, each member state and impose fees on
644 licensees of member states to whom it grants a multistate
Page 23

licensees of member states to whom it grants a multistate
SB163 Enrolled
645 license to cover the cost of the operations and activities of
646 the commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
647 sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year
648 for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The
649 aggregate annual assessment amount for member states shall be
650 allocated based upon a formula that the commission shall adopt
651 by rule.
652 (4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any
653 kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same;
654 nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any member
655 state, except by and with the authority of the member state.
656 (5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
657 receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of
658 the commission shall be subject to the financial review and
659 accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All
660 receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission
661 shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified
662 or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial
663 review shall be included in and become part of the annual
664 report of the commission.
665 (h) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
666 (1) The members, officers, executive director,
667 employees, and representatives of the commission shall be
668 immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their
669 official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of
670 property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by
671 or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
672 omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the
Page 24

omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the
SB163 Enrolled
673 claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
674 within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
675 responsibilities, provided that nothing in this subdivision
676 shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or
677 liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by
678 the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
679 person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the
680 commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the
681 immunity granted hereunder.
682 (2) The commission shall defend any member, officer,
683 executive director, employee, and representative of the
684 commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability
685 arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
686 that occurred within the scope of commission employment,
687 duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the
688 commission that the person against whom the claim is made had
689 a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
690 commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided
691 that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person
692 from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and
693 provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or
694 omission did not result from that person's intentional or
695 willful or wanton misconduct.
696 (3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless
697 any member, officer, executive director, employee, and
698 representative of the commission for the amount of any
699 settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising
700 out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
Page 25

out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
SB163 Enrolled
701 occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
702 responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis
703 for believing occurred within the scope of commission
704 employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the
705 actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from
706 the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
707 person.
708 (4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation
709 on the liability of any licensee for professional malpractice
710 or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
711 applicable state laws.
712 (5) Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to
713 waive or otherwise abrogate a member state's state action
714 immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to
715 antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any
716 other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or
717 regulation.
718 (6) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a
719 waiver of sovereign immunity by the member states or by the
720 commission.
721 §34-7B-89 Data system.
722 (a) The commission shall provide for the development,
723 maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated
724 database and reporting system.
725 (b) The commission shall assign each applicant for a
726 multistate license a unique identifier, as determined by the
727 rules of the commission.
728 (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to
Page 26

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to
SB163 Enrolled
729 the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set
730 to the data system on all individuals to whom this compact is
731 applicable as required by the rules of the commission,
732 including:
733 (1) Identifying information;
734 (2) Licensure data;
735 (3) Adverse actions against a license and information
736 related thereto;
737 (4) Nonconfidential information related to alternative
738 program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such
739 participation, and other information related to such
740 participation;
741 (5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the
742 reason for such denial, excluding the reporting of any
743 criminal history record information where prohibited by law;
744 (6) The existence of investigative information;
745 (7) The existence of current significant investigative
746 information; and
747 (8) Other information that may facilitate the
748 administration of this compact or the protection of the
749 public, as determined by the rules of the commission.
750 (d) The records and information provided to a member
751 state pursuant to this compact or through the data system,
752 when certified by the commission or an agent thereof, shall
753 constitute the authenticated business records of the
754 commission and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay
755 exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or
756 administrative proceedings in a member state.
Page 27

administrative proceedings in a member state.
SB163 Enrolled
757 (e) The existence of current significant investigative
758 information and the existence of investigative information
759 pertaining to a licensee in any member state shall only be
760 available to other member states.
761 (f) It is the responsibility of the member states to
762 monitor the database to determine whether adverse action has
763 been taken against such a licensee or license applicant.
764 Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee or license
765 applicant in any member state shall be available to any other
766 member state.
767 (g) Member states that contribute information to the
768 data system may designate information that may not be shared
769 with the public without the express permission of the
770 contributing state.
771 (h) Any information submitted to the data system that
772 is subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws
773 of the member state contributing the information shall be
774 removed from the data system.
775 §34-7B-90 Rulemaking.
776 (a) The commission shall adopt reasonable rules to
777 effectively and efficiently implement and administer the
778 purposes and provisions of the compact. A rule shall be
779 invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of
780 competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because
781 the commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner
782 that is beyond the scope and purposes of the compact, or the
783 powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable
784 standard of review.
Page 28

standard of review.
SB163 Enrolled
785 (b) The rules of the commission shall have the force of
786 law in each member state, provided that where the rules of the
787 commission conflict with the laws of the member state that
788 establish the member state's scope of practice laws governing
789 the practice of esthetics as held by a court of competent
790 jurisdiction, the rules of the commission shall be ineffective
791 in that state to the extent of the conflict.
792 (c) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
793 pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the
794 rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the
795 date specified by the commission for each rule.
796 (d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member
797 states rejects a rule or portion of a rule by enactment of a
798 statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
799 compact within four years of the date of adoption of the rule,
800 then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any
801 member state or to any state applying to participate in the
802 compact.
803 (e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special
804 meeting of the commission.
805 (f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the
806 commission shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to
807 provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and
808 arguments.
809 (g) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the
810 commission, and at least 30 days in advance of the meeting at
811 which the commission will hold a public hearing on the
812 proposed rule, the commission shall provide a notice of
Page 29

proposed rule, the commission shall provide a notice of
SB163 Enrolled
813 proposed rulemaking:
814 (1) On the website of the commission or other publicly
815 accessible platform;
816 (2) To persons who have requested notice of the
817 commission's notices of proposed rulemaking; and
818 (3) In such other ways as the commission, by rule, may
819 specify.
820 (h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
821 (1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing
822 at which the commission will hear public comments on the
823 proposed rule and, if different, the time, date, and location
824 of the meeting where the commission will consider and vote on
825 the proposed rule;
826 (2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
827 conference, or other electronic means, the commission shall
828 include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice
829 of proposed rulemaking;
830 (3) The text of the proposed rule and the reason
831 therefor;
832 (4) A request for comments on the proposed rule from
833 any interested person; and
834 (5) The manner in which interested persons may submit
835 written comments.
836 (i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the
837 recording and all written comments and documents received by
838 the commission in response to the proposed rule shall be
839 available to the public.
840 (j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
Page 30

(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
SB163 Enrolled
841 requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be
842 grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings
843 required by this section.
844 (k) The commission, by majority vote of all members,
845 shall take final action on the proposed rule based on the
846 rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
847 (1) The commission may adopt changes to the proposed
848 rule provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose
849 of the proposed rule.
850 (2) The commission shall provide an explanation of the
851 reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed rule as
852 well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were
853 recommended by commenters.
854 (3) The commission shall determine a reasonable
855 effective date for the rule. Except for an emergency as
856 provided in subsection (l), the effective date of the rule
857 shall be no sooner than 45 days after the commission adopted
858 or amended the rule.
859 (l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
860 commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule with five
861 days' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the
862 usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in
863 this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as
864 soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days
865 after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this
866 provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted
867 immediately to:
868 a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
Page 31

a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
SB163 Enrolled
869 welfare;
870 b. Prevent the loss of commission or member state
871 funds;
872 c. Meet a deadline for the adoption of a rule that is
873 established by federal law or rule; or
874 d. Protect public health and safety.
875 (m) The commission or an authorized committee of the
876 commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule
877 for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in
878 format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public
879 notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
880 commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
881 person for a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may
882 be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
883 material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in
884 writing and delivered to the commission prior to the end of
885 the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will
886 take effect without further action. If the revision is
887 challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
888 approval of the commission.
889 (n) No member state's rulemaking requirements shall
890 apply under this compact.
891 §34-7B-91 Oversight, dispute resolution, and
892 enforcement.
893 (a) Oversight.
894 (1) The executive and judicial branches of state
895 government in each member state shall enforce this compact and
896 take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the
Page 32

take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the
SB163 Enrolled
897 compact.
898 (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or
899 against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively
900 in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal
901 office of the commission is located. The commission may waive
902 venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or
903 consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
904 proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the
905 selection or propriety of venue in any action against a
906 licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such
907 similar matter.
908 (3) The commission shall be entitled to receive service
909 of process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or
910 interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to
911 intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to
912 provide the commission service of process shall render a
913 judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or
914 adopted rules.
915 (b) Default, technical assistance, and termination.
916 (1) If the commission determines that a member state
917 has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or
918 responsibilities under this compact or the adopted rules, the
919 commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting
920 state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the
921 proposed means of curing the default, and any other action
922 that the commission may take and shall offer training and
923 specific technical assistance regarding the default.
924 (2) The commission shall provide a copy of the notice
Page 33

(2) The commission shall provide a copy of the notice
SB163 Enrolled
925 of default to the other member states.
926 (c) If a state in default fails to cure the default,
927 the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon
928 an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the
929 member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits
930 conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on
931 the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does
932 not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities
933 incurred during the period of default.
934 (d) Termination of membership in the compact shall be
935 imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
936 been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall
937 be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and
938 minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature, the
939 defaulting state's licensing authority, and each of the member
940 states' licensing authority.
941 (e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for
942 all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through
943 the effective date of termination, including obligations that
944 extend beyond the effective date of termination.
945 (f) Upon the termination of a state's membership from
946 this compact, that state shall immediately provide notice to
947 all licensees who hold a multistate license within that state
948 of the termination. The terminated state shall continue to
949 recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a
950 minimum of 180 days after the date of the notice of
951 termination.
952 (g) The commission shall not bear any costs related to
Page 34

(g) The commission shall not bear any costs related to
SB163 Enrolled
953 a state that is found to be in default or that has been
954 terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing
955 between the commission and the defaulting state.
956 (h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the
957 commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the
958 District of Columbia or the federal district where the
959 commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party
960 shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
961 reasonable attorney fees.
962 (i) Dispute resolution.
963 (1) Upon request by a member state, the commission
964 shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that
965 arise among member states and between member and non-member
966 states.
967 (2) The commission shall adopt a rule providing for
968 both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
969 appropriate.
970 (j) Enforcement.
971 (1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
972 discretion, shall enforce the provisions of this compact and
973 the commission's rules.
974 (2) By majority vote as provided by commission rule,
975 the commission may initiate legal action against a member
976 state in default in the U.S. District Court for the District
977 of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has
978 its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
979 provisions of the compact and its adopted rules. The relief
980 sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
Page 35

sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
SB163 Enrolled
981 event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
982 shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
983 reasonable attorney fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
984 exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may
985 pursue any other remedies available under federal or the
986 defaulting member state's laws.
987 (3) A member state may initiate legal action against
988 the commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of
989 Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its
990 principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of
991 the compact and its adopted rules. The relief sought may
992 include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
993 judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall
994 be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable
995 attorney fees.
996 (4) No individual or entity other than a member state
997 may enforce this compact against the commission.
998 §34-7B-92 Effective date, withdrawal, and amendment.
999 (a) The compact shall come into effect on the date on
1000 which the compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh
1001 member state.
1002 (1) On or after the effective date of the compact, the
1003 commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of
1004 the charter member states to determine if the statute enacted
1005 by each such charter member state is materially different than
1006 the model compact statute.
1007 a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to
1008 be materially different from the model compact statute shall
Page 36

be materially different from the model compact statute shall
SB163 Enrolled
1009 be entitled to the default process set forth in Section
1010 34-7B-91.
1011 b. If any member state is later found to be in default,
1012 or is terminated or withdraws from the compact, the commission
1013 shall remain in existence, and the compact shall remain in
1014 effect even if the number of member states should be less than
1015 seven.
1016 (2) Member states enacting the compact after the
1017 charter member states shall be subject to the process set
1018 forth in Section 34-7B-88(c)(24) to determine if their
1019 enactments are materially different from the model compact
1020 statute and whether they qualify for participation in the
1021 compact.
1022 (3) All actions taken for the benefit of the commission
1023 or in furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the
1024 compact prior to the effective date of the compact or the
1025 commission coming into existence shall be considered actions
1026 of the commission unless specifically repudiated by the
1027 commission.
1028 (4) Any state that joins the compact shall be subject
1029 to the commission's rules and bylaws as they exist on the date
1030 on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that
1031 has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the
1032 full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes
1033 law in that state.
1034 (b) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by
1035 enacting a statute repealing that state's enactment of the
1036 compact.
Page 37

compact.
SB163 Enrolled
1037 (1) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect
1038 until 180 days after the enactment of the repealing statute.
1039 (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing
1040 requirement of the withdrawing state's licensing authority to
1041 comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting
1042 requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of
1043 withdrawal.
1044 (3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from
1045 this compact, a state shall immediately provide notice of the
1046 withdrawal to all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding
1047 any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, the
1048 withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses
1049 granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days
1050 after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
1051 (c) Nothing contained in this compact shall be
1052 construed to invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or
1053 other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a
1054 non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions of
1055 this compact.
1056 (d) This compact may be amended by the member states.
1057 No amendment to this compact shall become effective and
1058 binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the
1059 laws of all member states.
1060 §34-7B-93 Construction and severability.
1061 (a) This compact and the commission's rulemaking
1062 authority shall be liberally construed to effectuate the
1063 purposes and the implementation and administration of the
1064 compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or
Page 38

compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or
SB163 Enrolled
1065 requiring the adoption of rules shall not be construed to
1066 limit the commission's rulemaking authority solely for those
1067 purposes.
1068 (b) The provisions of this compact shall be severable,
1069 and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this
1070 compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
1071 contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state
1072 seeking participation in the compact, or of the United States,
1073 or the applicability thereof to any government, agency,
1074 person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a
1075 court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder
1076 of this compact, and the applicability thereof to any other
1077 government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be
1078 affected thereby.
1079 (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), the commission may
1080 deny a state's participation in the compact or, in accordance
1081 with the requirements of Section 34-7B-91, terminate a member
1082 state's participation in the compact if it determines that a
1083 constitutional requirement of a member state is a material
1084 departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact shall
1085 be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member
1086 state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to
1087 the remaining member states and in full force and effect as to
1088 the member state affected as to all severable matters.
1089 §34-7B-94 Consistent effect and conflict with other
1090 state laws.
1091 (a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the
1092 enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not
Page 39

enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not
SB163 Enrolled
1093 inconsistent with the compact.
1094 (b) Any laws, statutes, rules, or other legal
1095 requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact
1096 are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
1097 (c) All permissible agreements between the commission
1098 and the member states are binding in accordance with their
1099 terms.
1100 (d) The purpose of this compact is to facilitate
1101 multistate licensure for estheticians. Nothing herein shall
1102 subject a member state to any laws, rules, or policies from
1103 any other member state beyond the intended purpose of this
1104 compact.
1105 (e) Nothing herein shall require any member state to
1106 adopt additional laws, rules, or policies beyond the intended
1107 purpose of this compact.
1108 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1109 1, 2026.
Page 40

1, 2026.
SB163 Enrolled
1110
1111
1112
1113
1114
1115
1116 ________________________________________________
1117 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
1118
1119
1120
1121 ________________________________________________
1122 Speaker of the House of Representatives
1123
1124
1125 SB163
1126 Senate 27-Jan-26
1127 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
1128 the Senate.
1129
1130 Patrick Harris,
1131 Secretary.
1132
1133
1134
1135
1136 House of Representatives
1137 Passed: 31-Mar-26
1138
1139
1140
1141
1142 By: Senator Hatcher
Page 41